incubator/apertium-tr-az/apertium-tr-az.tr.dix.xml
      <pardef n="bin/mek__vblex">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>erim</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>er<b/>miyim</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mem</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez<b/>miyim</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ersin</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>er<b/>misin</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mezsin</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez<b/>misin</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>er</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>er<b/>mi</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez<b/>mi</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>eriz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>er<b/>miyiz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>meyiz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez<b/>miyiz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ersiniz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>er<b/>misiniz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mezsiniz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez<b/>misiniz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>erler</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>erler<b/>mi</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mezler</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mezler<b/>mi</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>

      <e lm="bezmek"><i>bez</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="biçmek"><i>biç</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="binmek"><i>bin</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="bükmek"><i>bük</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="büzmek"><i>büz</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="çökmek"><i>çök</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="delmek"><i>del</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="dikmek"><i>dik</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="dinmek"><i>din</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="dizmek"><i>diz</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="dökmek"><i>dök</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="dönmek"><i>dön</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="dövmek"><i>döv</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="düşmek"><i>düş</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="esmek"><i>es</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="eşmek"><i>eş</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="geçmek"><i>geç</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="germek"><i>ger</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="girmek"><i>gir</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="gitmek"><i>git</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="giymek"><i>giy</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="gülmek"><i>gül</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="içmek"><i>iç</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="inmek"><i>in</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="kesmek"><i>kes</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="küsmek"><i>küs</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="ölçmek"><i>ölç</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="örmek"><i>ör</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="ötmek"><i>öt</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="övmek"><i>öv</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="özlemek"><i>özle</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="pişmek"><i>piş</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="seçmek"><i>seç</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sekmek"><i>sek</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sevmek"><i>sev</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sezmek"><i>sez</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sikmek"><i>sik</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="silmek"><i>sil</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sinmek"><i>sin</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sönmek"><i>sön</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sürmek"><i>sür</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="süzmek"><i>süz</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="şişmek"><i>şiş</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="tepmek"><i>tep</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="tütmek"><i>tüt</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="tüymek"><i>tüy</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="ürkmek"><i>ürk</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="yenmek"><i>yen</i><par n="bin/mek__vblex"/></e>
